Louisiana, session 2026, HB163.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 9:2795.8 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§2795.8. Limitation of liability; private airport; recreational use
A. "Airport" has the same meaning as provided in R.S. 2:1(9).
B. No owner of a private airport shall be liable for any loss or damage to any
person permitted to fly or land aircraft on the owner's property when then loss or
damage is related to the recreational use of the property.